District of Columbia statutes.
42-603

“Covenant” binds covenantor, covenantee, and their privies.

When, in any deed, the word “covenant” is used, such word shall have the same effect as if the covenant was expressed to be by the covenantor, for himself, his heirs, devisees, and personal representatives, and shall be deemed to be with the grantee or lessee, his heirs, devisees, personal representatives, and assigns.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 505
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-503.
1973 Ed., § 45-303.